Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 7
CEMETERIES

31-25-701. Definitions.

As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Burial space" means a lot or portion thereof in any cemetery designed and intended for the interment of a human body but not used for such purpose.

"Cemetery" means any cemetery owned, managed, or controlled by any municipality in this state.

"Owner" means any person owning or possessing the privilege, license, or right of interment in any burial space.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1211, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-601 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-702. Power to establish cemeteries.

The governing body of any municipality has power to establish and regulate cemeteries within or without the municipality, to acquire lands therefor, by purchase or otherwise, and to cause cemeteries to be removed and prohibit their establishment within one mile of the municipality.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1211, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-101 (32) as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-703. Foreclosure proceedings.

When, pursuant to section 31-25-702, a municipality has established a cemetery, and the ordinance establishing the same requires the owners of burial spaces to pay annual assessments for or provide for the care and maintenance of such spaces, and the owner of any burial space has failed and neglected for a period of five years or more to pay such annual assessments for or to provide for the care and maintenance of such space, and no other provisions have been made in the ordinance, deed, or contract for the case of such a default, the governing body or the other official having jurisdiction over such cemetery may institute proceedings for the forfeiture, termination, or foreclosure of the rights and interests of such owner. When the governing body or other official determines there has been such failure and neglect, a resolution reciting such determination shall be duly adopted, and a certified copy shall be served on the owner personally by any competent person over the age of eighteen years or shall be sent by registered mail to the owner's last known address.

If compliance with said ordinances, rules, and regulations is not effected or provisions made therefor within a period of thirty days, the governing body may file a petition in the district court in and for the county in which said cemetery is located. The petition shall set forth the facts relating to the sale and ownership of such burial space as revealed by the records of said municipality and cemetery, a description of the burial space described in the same manner as such burial space is known and described on the books and records of the municipality and cemetery, and the failure and neglect to comply with the ordinances, rules, and regulations for the care and maintenance of said burial space. The petition shall ask for the forfeiture, termination, or foreclosure of all right, title, and interest of such owner in said burial space and that title thereto be vested in the municipality. The proceeding provided for in this section is deemed and held to be a proceeding in rem, and the procedure for forfeiture, termination, or foreclosure under this part 7 shall conform to the Colorado rules of civil procedure for the courts of record except as otherwise provided in this part 7. A copy of said petition with a notice of hearing thereon shall be served upon said owner in such manner and form as may be provided for the service of process by the Colorado rules of civil procedure. Thereupon it is the duty of such owner to appear and answer the allegations of said petition. If the owner fails to appear and answer on or prior to the day set for hearing, his default may be entered in the same manner as is provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure for the entering of defaults generally.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1211, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-602 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-704. Hearing and decree.

On the day set for hearing of the petition or on any subsequent day to which the hearing of the cause is continued, the proofs and allegations of the parties shall be presented to the court. If the court determines that the owner has failed and neglected for a period of five years next prior to the filing of said petition to comply with the ordinances, rules, and regulations relating to the maintenance and care of said burial space, a decree shall be entered accordingly forfeiting, terminating, or foreclosing the right, title, and interest of such owner in and to said burial space, subject to the provisions of this part 7. The decree shall fix a reasonable attorney fee for and recite the costs of said proceeding and shall further provide that title to said burial space shall be vested in the municipality, which municipality shall have the right to resell said burial space and to use the proceeds derived from such sale in the manner and for the purposes provided by law or ordinance for funds derived from sale of burial lots or spaces.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1212, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-603 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-705. Fees and costs.

The docket fees, court costs, and other fees and costs charged and collected for the proceeding provided for by this part 7 shall be the same as the fees and costs that are provided for by law in actions concerning title to real property. Any municipality has the right to pay all costs, attorney's fees, and expenses of such proceeding under this part 7 from any funds available.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1212, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-604 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-706. Used burial space proviso.

Nothing in this part 7 shall authorize the forfeiture, termination, or foreclosure of rights or interests in and to any burial space that has been used for interment nor shall any such space be subject to resale under the provisions of this part 7.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1212, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-605 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-707. Joint proceedings.

Any number of separate burial spaces or lots and any number of separate owners may be joined in one proceeding under this part 7.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1212, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-12-606 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-708. Abandoned burial sites - right to reclaim.

If there is a burial space in a cemetery in which no remains have been interred, no burial memorial has been placed, and no other improvement has been made for a continuous period of no less than seventy-five years, the governing body of the municipality may initiate the process of reclaiming title to the burial space in accordance with this section.

The governing body of a municipality seeking to reclaim a burial space shall:

Send written notice of the municipality's intent to reclaim title to the burial space to the owner's last-known address by first-class mail; and

Publish a notice of the municipality's intent to reclaim title to the burial space in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the cemetery is located once per week for four weeks.

The notice required by subsection (2) of this section shall clearly indicate that the municipality intends to terminate the owner's rights and title to the burial space and include a recitation of the owner's right to notify the municipality of the owner's intent to retain ownership of the burial space.

If the governing body of the municipality does not receive from the owner of the burial space a letter of intent to retain ownership of the burial space within sixty days after the last publication of the notice required by paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, all rights and title to the burial space shall transfer to the municipality. The municipality may then sell, transfer, or otherwise dispose of the burial space without risk of liability to the prior owner of the burial space.

A municipality that reclaims title to a burial space in accordance with this section shall retain in its records for no less than one year a copy of the notice sent pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section and a copy of the notice published pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

If a person submits to the governing body of a municipality a legitimate claim to a burial space that the governing body has reclaimed pursuant to this section, the governing body shall transfer to the person at no charge a burial space that, to the extent possible, is equivalent to the reclaimed burial space.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on and after August 7, 2006, the governing body of a municipality shall not convey title to the real property surveyed as a lot in a cemetery for use as a burial space. The governing body of a municipality may grant interment rights to a burial space in a cemetery.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 444, § 4, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Section 5 of chapter 128, Session Laws of Colorado 2006, provides that the act enacting this section applies to cemetery lots, grave spaces, niches, and crypts purchased before, on, or after August 7, 2006.